Maryland, session 2025, SB0765.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
5–525.3.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS SETTING THE MAXIMUM NUMBER OF
CHILDREN THAT MAY BE PLACED WITH AN OUT–OF–HOME PLACEMENT PROVIDER.
(B) THE LIMITATION ON THE NUMBER OF CHILDREN PLACED WITH AN
OUT–OF–HOME PLACEMENT PROVIDER IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A CHILD ENROLLED IN AN ACCREDITED
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION:
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, AN INDIVIDUAL
ENROLLED IN AN ACCREDITED INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION OR A
RESIDENTIAL VOCATIONAL TRAINING PROGRAM MAY RETURN TO AN OUT–OF–HOME
PLACEMENT PROVIDER WITH WHOM THE INDIVIDUAL WAS PREVIOUSLY PLACED IF:
(1) WHO THE INDIVIDUAL IS UNABLE TO REMAIN ON THE
INSTITUTION’S OR TRAINING PROGRAM’S CAMPUS DUE TO A SCHEDULED BREAK, A
TEMPORARY CLOSURE OF THE INSTITUTION OR TRAINING PROGRAM, OR A
TEMPORARY LEAVE OF ABSENCE; AND
(2) WHOSE THE INDIVIDUAL’S LIVING ARRANGEMENT IN THE HOME IS
MUTUALLY AGREED TO BY THE CHILD INDIVIDUAL, THE OUT–OF–HOME PLACEMENT
PROVIDER, AND THE PROVIDER AGENCY; AND
(3) THE DEPARTMENT HAS REVIEWED AND APPROVED THE
INDIVIDUAL’S REQUEST TO RETURN TO THE OUT–OF–HOME PLACEMENT PROVIDER.
(B) (1) TO RETURN TO AN OUT–OF–HOME PLACEMENT PROVIDER WITH
WHOM AN INDIVIDUAL WAS PREVIOUSLY PLACED DURING A SCHEDULED BREAK OF
AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION OR A RESIDENTIAL VOCATIONAL TRAINING
PROGRAM, THE INDIVIDUAL SHALL MAKE A REQUEST TO A LOCAL DEPARTMENT TO
RETURN TO THE OUT–OF–HOME PLACEMENT PROVIDER AT LEAST 30 DAYS BEFORE
THE SCHEDULED BREAK.

SENATE BILL 765 3
(2) A LOCAL DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE A RECOMMENDATION TO THE
DEPARTMENT REGARDING A REQUEST MADE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION NOT LATER THAN 21 DAYS BEFORE THE SCHEDULED BREAK.
(3) IF A LOCAL DEPARTMENT RECOMMENDS APPROVING AN
INDIVIDUAL’S REQUEST TO RETURN TO AN OUT–OF–HOME PLACEMENT PROVIDER
DURING A SCHEDULED BREAK, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE A DETERMINATION
REGARDING THE LOCAL DEPARTMENT’S RECOMMENDATION NOT LATER THAN 14
DAYS BEFORE THE SCHEDULED BREAK.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.